Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.390

Recall or reissuance of warrant.

The governor may recall his or her warrant of arrest or may issue another warrant whenever he or she deems proper.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1082; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 20.]